District of Columbia statutes.
10-1211

Transferred

Established.

Recodified as § 10-1271 [repealed].

Nov. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 3-36, § 3, 26 DCR 1439
Dec. 21, 1985, D.C. Law 6-74, § 3(a), 32 DCR 6475
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 23, 36 DCR 492
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-199, § 2, 37 DCR 7332